Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.370

Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship program.

The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives may administer and conduct a legislative page scholarship program to provide resources for Washington students who participate in the page programs of the senate or house of representatives. The scholarship program should provide assistance to students, based on financial need, who qualify for a page program. The program is called the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship program.

[ 2017 c 322 s 1.]